North Carolina, session 2025, HB832.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXPAND AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT IN ADVANCED COURSES IN K-12
SCHOOLS TO INCLUDE ENGLISH LANGUAGE ARTS COURSES
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-81.36 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-81.36. Advanced courses in mathematics.mathematics and English Language
Arts.
(a) When practicable, local boards of education shall offer advanced learning
opportunities in mathematics in grades three through five, and advanced courses in mathematics
in all grades six and higher. For the purposes of this section, advanced learning opportunities are
those services and curricular modifications in mathematics and English Language Arts for
academically or intellectually gifted students approved as part of the local plan, as required by
G.S. 115C-150.7.G.S. 115C-150.7, and advanced courses are advanced courses in mathematics
and English Language Arts.
(a1) When advanced learning opportunities are offered in mathematics in grades three
through five, any student scoring at the highest level on the corresponding end-of-grade test shall,
for the next school year, be provided advanced learning opportunities in mathematics approved
for that student's grade level. No student who qualifies under this subsection shall be removed
from the advanced learning opportunity provided to the student unless a parent or guardian of the
student provides written consent for the student to be excluded or removed after being adequately
informed that the student's placement was determined by the student's achievement on the
previous end-of-grade test.
(b) When advanced courses are offered in mathematics in grades six and higher, any
student scoring at the highest level on the corresponding end-of-grade or end-of-course test for
the mathematics course in which the student was most recently enrolled shall be enrolled in the
advanced course for the next mathematics course in which the student is enrolled. A student in
seventh grade scoring at the highest level on the seventh grade mathematics end-of-grade test
shall be enrolled in a high school level mathematics course in eighth grade. Local boards of
education may provide supplemental content enrichment, which may include the administration
of diagnostic assessments, to students enrolled in a high school level mathematics course. No
student who qualifies under this subsection shall be removed from the advanced or high school
mathematics course in which the student is enrolled unless a parent or guardian of the student
provides written consent for the student to be excluded or removed from that course after being
*H832-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
adequately informed that the student's placement was determined by the student's achievement
on the previous end-of-grade or end-of-course test.
(b1) When a high school mathematics course is offered in eighth grade, a student in
seventh grade scoring at the highest level on the seventh grade mathematics end-of-grade test
shall be enrolled in a high school level mathematics course in eighth grade.
(c) By December 15, 2020, and annually thereafter, the The Department of Public
Instruction shall submit a report annually by December 15 to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee containing data collected for the current school year on the number and
demographics number, demographics, and socioeconomic status of students who were eligible
for advanced mathematics courses under this section, including high school level mathematics
courses in eighth grade, and of those students, the number and demographics number,
demographics, and socioeconomic status of those who were placed in advanced mathematics
courses and were not placed in advanced mathematics courses. The report shall include
information on the type and format of advanced mathematics courses provided and shall also
include any feedback provided by local boards of education on the implementation of this section.
(d) The Department of Public Instruction shall provide guidance to local boards of
education on how to best develop programming and courses to ensure all impacted students
receive rigorous, academically appropriate instruction in mathematics.mathematics and English
Language Arts.
(e) No student who qualifies for advanced learning opportunities or advanced courses
under this section shall be removed from the advanced learning opportunity or advanced course
provided to the student unless a parent or guardian of the student provides written consent for the
student to be excluded or removed after being adequately informed that the student's placement
was determined by the student's achievement on the previous end-of-grade or end-of-course test.
Local boards of education may provide supplemental content enrichment, which may include the
administration of diagnostic assessments, to students enrolled in advanced courses."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART II. ALLOW PARENT CHOICE IN NURSING SERVICE PROVIDERS
REQUIRED BY AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-111.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.2. Contracts with private service providers.
(a) Local educational agencies furnishing special education and related services to
children with disabilities may contract with private special education facilities or service
providers to furnish any of these services that the public providers are unable to furnish.services.
(b) As used in this subsection, "nursing services" are services that may only be provided
by nurses licensed in accordance with Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes. When
providing nursing services pursuant to a child's IEP, local educational agencies shall assign the
parent's choice of nurse to provide the nursing services required by the child's IEP if all of the
following apply:
(1) The child received nursing services from the nurse (i) prior to the nursing
services being required by the child's IEP or (ii) prior to the child enrolling in
his or her current school.
(2) The parent's choice of nurse is employed by a nursing agency and willing to
provide the nursing services required by the child's IEP.
(3) The nursing agency employing the parent's choice of nurse is willing to enter
into a contract with the local educational agency that otherwise meets the
standard contract terms required for any other nursing agency contracted by
the local educational agency, including licensing and liability requirements.
Page 2 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The contracted rate is equal to or less than the contracted rate of other nurses
contracted by the local educational agency.
(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the local educational agency's
responsibility to provide a free appropriate public education."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year. If Senate Bill 77, 2025 Regular Session, becomes law, this
section is repealed.

PART III. CHARTER SCHOOLS REVIEW BOARD AMENDMENTS AND OTHER
CHARTER SCHOOL AMENDMENTS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-218 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218. Purpose of charter schools; role of State Board of Education; establishment
of North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board and North Carolina Office of
Charter Schools.
…
(a1) State Board of Education. – The State Board of Education shall have the following
duties regarding charter schools:
(1) Rulemaking. – To establish adopt all rules for the operation and approval of
charter schools. Any rule or policy adopted by the State Board regarding
charter schools shall first be recommended approved by the Charter Schools
Review Board.
(2) Funding. – To allocate funds to charter schools.
(3) Appeals. – To hear appeals from decisions of the Charter Schools Review
Board under G.S. 115C-218.9.
(4) Accountability. – To ensure accountability from charter schools for school
finances and student performance.
(5) Review of financial assistance. – The State Board shall assign the Review
Board to conduct any hearings pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1231b-2, including
making findings and recommendations regarding those hearings.
(b) North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board. –
…
(10) Powers and duties. – The Review Board shall have the following duties:
a. To make recommendations to the State Board of Education on the
adoption of propose, recommend, and approve rules and policies
regarding all aspects of charter school operation, including time lines,
processes, standards, and criteria for acceptance and approval of
applications, monitoring of charter schools, and grounds for
revocation of charters.
…
e. To conduct hearings and make findings and recommendations
pursuant to subdivision (a1)(5) of this section.
f. To contract for and employ legal counsel, including private counsel,
to advise, represent, and provide litigation services to the Review
Board, without the need to obtain permission or approval pursuant to
G.S. 114-2.3 or G.S. 147-17.
…
(c) North Carolina Office of Charter Schools. –
…
(2) Executive Director. – The Executive Director shall report to and serve at the
pleasure of the Superintendent of Public Instruction Review Board at a salary
established by the Superintendent Review Board within the funds
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
appropriated for this purpose. The duties of the Executive Director shall
include presenting the recommendations and decisions of the Review Board
at meetings of the State Board.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-218.15(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) A charter school shall operate under the written charter signed by the State
Superintendent and the applicant. The terms of the written charter shall be approved by the
Review Board. A charter school is not required to enter into any other contract. The charter shall
incorporate the information provided in the application, as modified during the charter approval
process, and any terms and conditions imposed on the charter school by the Review Board, or if
the approval is granted through an appeal pursuant to G.S. 115C-218.9, any conditions imposed
by the State Board of Education. No other terms may be imposed on the charter school as a
condition for receipt of local funds."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 115C-218.85 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) Notwithstanding G.S. 116-11(10a) or any other provision of law to the contrary, a
charter school shall not be required to list class rank on a student's official transcript or record."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 115C-218.90(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(7) A charter school may develop and use any evaluation for conducting
evaluations of teachers provided that it includes standards and criteria similar
to those used in the North Carolina Professional Teaching Standards and
North Carolina Teacher Evaluation Process, or such other evaluation standard
and process required to be used by local school administrative units."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 115C-218.94 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) The Review Board shall require charter schools that are identified as low-performing
or continually low-performing to prepare and report on plans to improve the performance of the
school. The requirements of G.S. 115C-105.27 shall not apply to charter schools."
SECTION 3.(f) G.S. 115C-218.105 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.105. State and local funds for a charter school.
…
(a2) The State Board shall withhold or reduce distribution of funds to a charter school if
any of the following applies:
(1) The change in funding is due to an annual adjustment based on enrollment or
is a general adjustment to allocations that is not specific to the charter or
actions of that charter school.
(2) The Review Board notifies the State Board that the charter school has
materially violated a term of its charter, has violated a State statute or federal
law, or has had its charter terminated or nonrenewed.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction Review Board notifies the State
Board that the charter school has failed to meet generally accepted standards
of fiscal management or has violated a State or federal requirement for receipt
of funds.
…
(c2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction Review Board shall, in consultation with
charter schools and local school administrative units, create a standardized enrollment
verification and transfer request document that each charter school shall use to request the per
pupil share of the local current expense fund from the local school administrative units. Charter
schools shall only be required to list the name, age, grade, address, date of charter enrollment,
date of charter withdrawal, district of residence, and student identification number of each student
as provided to the charter school by the student's parent or guardian in the enrollment verification
and transfer request document that the charter school submits to the local school administrative
Page 4 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
units. A charter school, in its discretion, may take further steps to confirm the student's residence
in a particular local school administrative unit.
(c3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction Review Board shall, in consultation with
charter schools and local school administrative units, create a standardized procedure that local
school administrative units shall use when transferring the per pupil share of the local current
expense fund to charter schools. The standardized procedure for transfer of the per pupil share of
the local current expense fund shall require, to the extent practicable, that the local school
administrative units make the transfers by electronic transfer.
…."
SECTION 3.(g) G.S. 115C-218.123 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) If a school is operating under a charter that allows for a remote academy as part of the
charter, and the school enrolls or intends to enroll 250 or more students in the remote academy,
the school may request that the Review Board grant the remote academy portion of the school a
separate charter by submitting the information listed under subsection (a) of this section with the
request. Requests submitted pursuant to this section shall be reviewed through an expedited
process to be established by the Review Board. The Review Board shall not require a planning
year for remote academies granted a charter pursuant to this subsection."
SECTION 3.(h) G.S. 115C-218.125 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.125. Evaluation.
(a) The State Board of Education shall evaluate the success of remote charter academies
approved under this Part. Success shall be measured by school performance scores and grades,
retention rates, attendance rates, and, for grades nine through 12, high school completion and
dropout rates. The Board shall report by November 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee on the evaluation of these academies and on any recommended
statutory changes.
(b) If a school is operating under a charter that includes in-person instruction and a remote
charter academy, the remote charter academy shall receive a separate school performance grade
and be treated as a separate school for the purposes of assessing the performance of the remote
charter academy pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-83.15, 115C-218.94, and 115C-218.95."
SECTION 3.(i) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART IV. DPI TO CONTINUE PROVIDING FINANCIAL DATA REPORTING
PLATFORM TO CHARTERS FOR INITIAL YEAR OF OPERATION
SECTION 4.(a) Part 4 of Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-218.106. Initial financial data reporting expenses.
The Department of Public Instruction shall provide a charter school access to any required
financial data reporting platforms during the charter school's first year of operation at no cost to
the charter school."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART V. CEP MEAL INCENTIVE PROGRAM
SECTION 5.(a) Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-264.6. CEP Meal Incentive Program.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply to this section:
(1) CEP. – Community Eligibility Provision.
(2) Department. – Department of Public Instruction.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Eligible unit. – A local school administrative unit, school within a local school
administrative unit, regional school, or charter school that meets all of the
following:
a. Qualifies for the federal CEP program.
b. Did not participate in the federal CEP program in the 2023-2024 fiscal
year.
(4) ISP. – Identified Student Percentage.
(5) Participating school. – A school participating in the Program.
(6) Participating unit. – An eligible unit selected to participate in the Program.
(7) Program. – The CEP Meal Incentive Program established pursuant to this
section.
(b) Program; Purpose. – The Department shall establish the Program to expand public
school participation in the federal CEP program to increase the number of students with access
to healthy, cost-free school breakfast and lunch. In each year where funds are made available for
this purpose, the Program shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(c) Application. – By April 15 of each year of the Program, the Department shall develop
the application for the Program and make it available to eligible units. To be considered for
selection for the Program, eligible units shall submit their applications by June 1 of each year. At
a minimum, the application shall include the following information:
(1) The school or schools that will participate in the CEP program.
(2) The ISP for the school or schools for the current school year.
(3) The number of students enrolled in the school or schools for the current school
year.
(4) Participation rates in the National School Breakfast and Lunch programs for
the current school year for the schools requesting to receive the incentive.
(d) Selection. – By July 15 of each year of the Program, the Department shall determine
whether each applicant is eligible to participate. The Department shall then award grants to all
eligible units that apply. If there are insufficient funds to award grants to all eligible units that
apply, the Department shall first prioritize awarding grants to eligible units with an ISP of greater
than or equal to fifty-five percent (55%) and then prioritize awarding grants to those schools that
will draw the greatest federal match.
(e) Grants. – The Department shall issue State reimbursements to participating units to
supplement federal reimbursements of school meals. State reimbursements shall equal the
difference between the federal free rate and the federal paid rate for the number of meals served
at the participating schools equal to a 0.2 multiplier of the ISP for the participating schools. State
and federal reimbursements shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the federal free rate
of meals served. Participating schools shall have an innovative breakfast option available where
students have access to breakfast and are allowed to consume breakfast in the classroom.
(f) Nonsupplant Requirement. – A participating unit shall use the funds to supplement
and not supplant local current expense funds.
(g) Report. – No later than January 1 of each year of the Program, the Department shall
report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division
at least the following information:
(1) The number of participating schools.
(2) The number of students who received free meals who would not have
otherwise received free meals had the participating school not utilized the
incentive.
(3) The amount of federal and State money participating units received.
(4) Any increase in student success due to the participating school's utilization of
the incentive and participation in the Program.
Page 6 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Administration. – The Department may use up to five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) of the funds appropriated for the Program for administrative costs."
SECTION 5.(b) Section 7.59 of S.L. 2023-134 is repealed.
SECTION 5.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART VI. ALLOW CERTAIN NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS TO REQUEST RESIDENCY
LICENSES FOR TEACHERS
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 115C-270.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.1. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions shall apply:
…
(1b) Individualized education program (IEP). – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(2) Professional educator. – An administrator, teacher, or student services
personnel.
(3) Recognized educator preparation program or recognized EPP. – As defined in
G.S. 115C-269.1(15).
(3a) Related services. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(3b) Special education. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
…."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 115C-270.20(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Teacher Licenses. – The State Board shall adopt rules for the issuance of the following
classes of teacher licenses, including required levels of preparation for each classification:
…
(5) Residency License or RL. – A one-year license, renewable twice, that meets
both of the following requirements:
a. Is requested by the governing body of a public school unit an eligible
entity and accompanied by a certification of supervision from the
recognized educator preparation program in which the individual is
enrolled. For the purposes of this sub-subdivision, an eligible entity is
one of the following:
1. The governing body of a public school unit.
2. A nonpublic school that meets all of the following:
I. Meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39
of this Chapter.
II. Is approved and monitored by the Department of Public
Instruction to provide special education and related
services pursuant to a student's IEP.
b. The individual for whom the license is requested meets all of the
following requirements:
1. Holds at least one of the following:
I. A bachelor's degree.
II. An advanced degree.
2. Has either completed coursework relevant to the requested
licensure area or passed the content area examination relevant
to the requested licensure area that has been approved by the
State Board.
3. Is enrolled in a recognized educator preparation program.
4. Meets all other requirements established by the State Board,
including completing preservice requirements prior to
teaching.
…."
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
applications for residency licenses occurring on or after that date. If Senate Bill 125, 2025
Regular Session, becomes law, this section is repealed.

PART VII. CONVERTING A LIMITED LICENSE TO A CONTINUING
PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 115C-270.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.15. Examination requirements.
…
(e) Conversion to Continuing Professional License. – The Except as provided in
subsection (f) of this section, the State Board shall not convert an IPL or RL IPL, RL, or limited
license to a continuing professional license for a teacher who has not fulfilled the examination
requirements of this section.
(f) Waiver of Examination Requirements for Certain Individuals with Limited Licenses.
– The State Board shall convert a limited license to a continuing professional license for a teacher
who has available growth data under the Education Value-Added Assessment System (EVAAS)
and has a positive growth score for two of the three most recent years for which growth scores
are available."
SECTION 7.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to limited
licenses expiring on or after that date.

PART VIII. TECHNICAL ADJUSTMENTS TO PRINCIPAL AND ADMINISTRATOR
LICENSES
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 115C-270.20(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Administrator Licenses. – The State Board shall establish rules for the issuance of the
following classes of administrator licenses, including required levels of preparation for each
classification:
(1) Administrator license. – A five-year renewable license issued to an individual
who meets all of the following requirements:
a. Holds a bachelor's degree.
b. Has successfully completed an approved administrator preparation
program.
c. Has at least four years of experience as a licensed professional
educator.
d. Has submitted a portfolio to the State Board for approval that meets
criteria adopted by the State Board.
e. Meets other requirements adopted by the State Board.
(1a) Principal license. – A five-year renewable license issued to an individual who
meets all of the following requirements:
a. Holds a bachelor's degree.
b. Has successfully completed an approved principal preparation
program.
c. Has at least four years of experience as a licensed professional
educator.
d. Has submitted a portfolio to the State Board for approval that meets
criteria adopted by the State Board.
(2) Provisional assistant principal license. – A one-year license to be employed as
an assistant principal, renewable twice, issued to an employee of a local board
of education if one of the following requirements is met:
a. The local board of education determines there is a demonstrated need
for administrators and the employee enrolls in an approved
Page 8 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administrator principal preparation program by the end of the first year
of provisional licensure.
b. The employee is participating in an internship required for completion
of an approved administrator principal preparation program."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 115C-270.1, as amended by Section 6(a) of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.1. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Administrator. – An administrator or supervisor who serves in general and
program administrator roles, as classified by the State Board. Administrators
shall include superintendents, assistant or associate superintendents,
principals, assistant principals, or curriculum-instructional specialists.
(1a) Approved administrator principal preparation program or approved APP.– –
An administrator PPP. – A principal preparation program, as defined in
G.S. 115C-284.1, that has been approved by the State Board as meeting the
requirements established by rule.
(1b) Individualized education program (IEP). – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(2) Professional educator. – An administrator, teacher, or student services
personnel.
(3) Recognized educator preparation program or recognized EPP. – As defined in
G.S. 115C-269.1(15).
(3a) Related services. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(3b) Special education. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(4) Student services personnel. – An individual providing specialized assistance
to students, teachers, administrators, or the education program in general, as
classified by the State Board. Student services personnel shall include
individuals employed in school counseling, school social work, school
psychology, audiology, speech-language pathology, and media coordination.
(5) Teacher. – An individual whose major responsibility is to either teach or
directly supervise teaching, as classified by the State Board."
SECTION 8.(c) G.S. 115C-284.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-284.1. Administrator Principal preparation programs.
(a) Role of APPs. – PPPs. – To recommend candidates for licensure, an administrator a
principal preparation program (APP) (PPP) shall be approved by the State Board. For the
purposes of this section, an APP a PPP is any entity that meets all of the following:
(1) Prepares, trains, and recommends candidates for administrator principal
licensure.
(2) Leads to a Master's of School Administration (MSA) or Master's of Education
in Educational Leadership unless the candidate already holds a master's or
doctoral degree in an education-related field.
(3) Meets one of the following:
a. Is accredited by a programmatic accrediting agency recognized by the
Secretary of Education pursuant to federal law.
b. Was approved by the State Board of Education as a school
administrator preparation program prior to April 1, 2023.
(b) State Board Authority. – The State Board shall have the authority to approve an APP
a PPP that meets the requirements established by rule as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Rules for Granting State Approval. – The State Board shall adopt rules for granting
approval to APPs PPPs in accordance with this section. The rules shall ensure the following:
(1) A rigorous approval process that requires that the criteria in this section are
met.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An application process, peer review, and technical assistance provided by the
State Board.
(3) An approval period of five years and process for renewal of approval.
(d) Minimum Approval Standards. – At a minimum, the rules established as provided in
subsection (c) of this section shall require APPs PPPs to meet the following requirements:
(1) Require all candidates to complete an internship that is at least 500 hours in
duration.
(2) Require the development of portfolios that meet criteria adopted by the State
Board and provide evidence that candidates are applying their training to
actual school needs and challenges.
(3) Require that all APP PPP candidates demonstrate competencies in (i) using
digital and other instructional technologies and (ii) supporting teachers and
other school personnel to use digital and other instructional technologies to
ensure provision of high-quality, integrated digital teaching and learning to all
students.
(4) Align with the standards for the evaluation of school executives and
specifically address the use of the results of the Teacher Working Conditions
Survey.
(5) Require evidence of a high level of institutional commitment, including
dedicated resources, for APP PPP improvements and redesign.
(6) Require the use of cross-functional work teams to determine a common
curriculum framework that (i) is designed to align with defined standards, (ii)
includes rigorous core courses, and (iii) will produce administrators principals
who meet the defined standards. The cross-functional work teams shall
include school-based personnel, faculty from schools of education and other
disciplines from institutions of higher education, and representatives of State
agencies.
(7) Require the use of cross-functional work teams to design and periodically
update specific standards regarding placement, required activities, and
evaluations of clinical experiences. These standards shall include appropriate
training for the school leaders who agree to accept and supervise interns.
(8) Require written agreements between the institution of higher education and a
public school unit to govern their shared responsibility for (i) recruitment and
preparation of school administrators, principals, especially with regard to
clinical experiences, including the internship, and (ii) a new administrator's
principal's success once employed.
(9) Require authentic partnerships between adjunct faculty and full-time faculty
to fully address the need for both practical, field-based experience and
academic, theory-based experience. These partnerships may require a change
in the institution of higher education's definition of scholarly activity and its
reward system.
(10) Incorporate the criteria developed in accordance with G.S. 116-74.21 for
assessing proposals under the School Administrator Training Program.
(e) The State Board of Education shall develop rules to determine whether an applicant
who completed an administrator a principal preparation program outside the State meets or
exceeds the requirements to hold a North Carolina administrator principal license."
SECTION 8.(d) Section 3J.15 of S.L. 2024-57 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 3J.15. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or policy to the contrary, the State Board
of Education shall waive the portfolio requirement for an administrator a principal license
required by G.S. 115C-270.20(b)(1)d. G.S. 115C-270.20(b)(1a)d. for any individual who meets
the following criteria:
Page 10 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Prior to August 31, 2025, the individual completed at least one course as part
of an approved administrator principal preparation program.
(2) The individual meets all licensure requirements in State law, rule, or policy
not otherwise waived by this section.
(3) The individual does not qualify for a waiver pursuant to S.L. 2021-170, as
amended by S.L. 2022-71."
SECTION 8.(e) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to initial
applicants for administrator or principal licensure on or after that date.

PART IX. ADVANCED TEACHING ROLES – LIMITED CLASS SIZE EXCEPTION
AND TRACK ROLES IN STUDENT INFORMATION SYSTEM
SECTION 9.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-301 and G.S. 115C-310.7, for any ATR
unit that received its final year of grant funding under G.S. 115C-310.11 in the 2024-2025 school
year, the State Board of Education may authorize the ATR unit to exceed the maximum class
size requirements for kindergarten through third grade for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school
years. For the purposes of this subsection, an ATR unit is as defined in G.S. 115C-310.3.
SECTION 9.(b) G.S. 115C-310.15 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) The Department of Public Instruction shall create designations for teachers serving in
advanced teaching roles in the student information system."
SECTION 9.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART X. LOCAL BOARDS OF EDUCATION TO PUBLISH TOTAL COMPENSATION
AND POSITION INFORMATION FOR CENTRAL OFFICE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 10.(a) G.S. 115C-320 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-320. Certain records open to inspection.Publication and inspection of certain
records.
(a) Each local board of education shall maintain a record of each of its employees,
showing the following information with respect to each employee:
(1) Name.
(2) Age.
(3) Date of original employment or appointment.
(4) The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written
or oral, past and current, to the extent that the board has the written contract
or a record of the oral contract in its possession.
(5) Current position.
(6) Title.
(7) Current salary.total compensation, as defined in sub-subdivision a. of
subdivision (1) of subsection (b1) of this section.
(8) Date and amount of each increase or decrease in salary total compensation, as
defined in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of subsection (b1) of this
section, with that local board of education.
(9) Date and type of each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation,
or other change in position classification with that local board of education.
(10) Date and general description of the reasons for each promotion with that local
board of education.
(11) Date and type of each dismissal, suspension, or demotion for disciplinary
reasons taken by the local board of education. If the disciplinary action was a
dismissal, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the local board
education setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the
dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) For the purposes of this section, the term "central office employees" refers to
superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators,
supervisors, finance officers, all personnel categorized as central office employees by the
Department of Public Instruction or the local school administrative unit, and any permanent
employee of the local school administrative unit or employee of a third-party contractor with the
local school administrative unit that is not assigned to a school campus. The term "salary"
includes pay, benefits, incentives, supplements, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of
compensation paid by the employing entity.
(b1) No later than August 15, 2025, and annually thereafter, each local board of education
shall publish and maintain on its website all of the following information:
(1) For each central office employee:
a. Total compensation from all funding sources, including at least the
following:
1. Salary.
2. Reimbursements and allowances, including reimbursements
and allowances related to travel.
b. Position title.
c. Position description.
d. The date the position was created.
e. The department, unit, or office of the local school administrative unit
in which the position is located.
(2) The title of each central office employee position in the local school
administrative unit and the number of positions associated with that title.
(3) For each department, unit, or office of the local school administrative unit:
a. The number of central office employees located in that department,
unit, or office.
b. The number of central office employees for each position title.
(c) Subject only to rules and regulations for the safekeeping of records adopted by the
local board of education, every person having custody of the records shall permit them to be
inspected and examined and copies made by any person during regular business hours. The name
of a participant in the Address Confidentiality Program established pursuant to Chapter 15C of
the General Statutes shall not be open to inspection and shall be redacted from any record released
pursuant to this section. Any person who is denied access to any record for the purpose of
inspecting, examining or copying the record shall have a right to compel compliance with the
provisions of this section by application to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of
mandamus or other appropriate relief."
SECTION 10.(b) The title of Article 21A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Article 21A.
"Privacy of Employee Personnel Records."
SECTION 10.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law. If Senate Bill 449,
2025 Regular Session, becomes law, this section is repealed.

PART XI. ESTABLISH STANDARDS FOR AGREEMENTS BETWEEN
CONSTITUENT INSTITUTIONS OF THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA
AND LOCAL SCHOOL ADMINISTRATIVE UNITS FOR THE OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE OF LABORATORY SCHOOLS
SECTION 11.(a) G.S. 116-239.8(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The chancellor shall be the administrative head of a laboratory school approved by
the Subcommittee and shall provide general direction for the establishment and operation of a
laboratory school. The chancellor, with advice and input from the advisory board established in
Page 12 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall adopt policies, operating procedures, and the courses of
study to govern the operation of the laboratory school. The chancellor may designate the duties
required by this Article to other personnel as necessary. The chancellor shall also have the
following powers and duties:
…
(4) Operation and maintenance of laboratory schools. Cost standards for
laboratory schools. – The Board of Governors and the State Board of
Education shall jointly determine standards for establishing the costs to local
school administrative units for providing the facilities and services identified
in this subdivision subdivision (4b) of this subsection for the operation and
maintenance of a laboratory school. The standards shall include at least the
lease amount by square foot for facility leases, which shall incorporate the
cost of the outstanding debt service for the facility.
(4a) Memorandum of understanding. – The chancellor and the local school
administrative unit shall adopt a memorandum of understanding for the
operation and maintenance of the laboratory school that includes the facilities
and services identified in subdivision (4b) of this subsection. The chancellor
and the local school administrative unit shall review and update the
memorandum at least every five years and any updated memorandum shall
take effect no earlier than the next school year. For any proposal to amend a
term of the memorandum regarding facilities, services, or operations of the
laboratory school, the proposing party shall provide at least six months' notice,
and the amendment shall take effect no earlier than the next school year.
(4b) Facilities and services. – A local school administrative unit shall provide, at
the laboratory school's request, any of the following facilities and services to
the laboratory school, but the costs of those facilities and services charged to
the laboratory school shall not exceed the established standards for
determination of costs. The following shall be determined in a memorandum
of understanding between the chancellor and the local school administrative
unit for the operation and maintenance of the laboratory school as
needed:school:
a. Facilities and leases. – Upon request, the local school administrative
unit in which the laboratory school is located shall lease adequate
facilities to the constituent institution for use as a laboratory school.
Unless the laboratory school requests not to include any of the
following, the lease shall include use of or access to any existing
buildings, parking areas, playgrounds, driveways required for ingress
and egress, furniture, classroom space, a cafeteria or multipurpose
room, moveable equipment, appliances, playground materials,
including a library collection, instructional materials, and classroom
and other technology equipment necessary to operate the laboratory
school. The lease term shall be terminated if the laboratory school
ceases operation. Upon request, the local school administrative unit
shall maintain the facilities and premises of the laboratory school and
keep them in good repair and tenantable condition by providing all
routine custodial services and routine facilities maintenance services,
including routine indoor maintenance, routine mowing, trimming, and
maintenance of exterior landscaping and snow removal, and timely
repair of the facilities and premises. The chancellor is authorized to
execute the lease agreement and memoranda of agreement for the
operation of a laboratory school.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Transportation services. – Upon request, the local school
administrative unit in which the laboratory school is located shall
provide transportation to students who reside in the local school
administrative unit and attend the laboratory school, including any
students who are homeless and require assistance pursuant to 42
U.S.C. § 11301, et seq., the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance
Act. The requirement to provide transportation to students residing in
the local school administrative unit shall (i) apply regardless of where
a laboratory school student resides in the unit or how the unit's
transportation policies and practices are applied to other students and
(ii) upon request, include providing transportation of students and
personnel for laboratory school extracurricular activities and
educational trips in the same manner as other schools in the unit for
that school year.
c. Food services. – The laboratory school shall strive to ensure that one
hundred percent (100%) muscadine grape juice is made available to
students as a part of the school's nutrition program or through the
operation of the school's vending facilities. Upon request, Food
services shall be provided to students of the laboratory school as
follows:
1. Unless the laboratory school agrees in the memorandum of
understanding to administer the National School Lunch
Program as the school food authority for its own students, the
local school administrative unit in which the laboratory school
is located shall administer the National School Lunch Program
as the school food authority for the laboratory school in
accordance with G.S. 115C-264. As part of that process, the
local school administrative unit shall do at least the following:
I. Purchase, prepare, deliver, and serve food and drink for
students in the laboratory school.
II. Engage in any contracts or other actions necessary to
provide these services, including procuring federal
reimbursement funds.
2. The laboratory school shall strive to ensure that one hundred
percent (100%) muscadine grape juice is made available to
students as part of the school's nutrition program or through the
operation of the school's vending facilities.
d. Student support services. – Upon request, the local school
administrative unit in which the laboratory school is located shall
provide any of the following student support services for the operation
of the laboratory school, including:
1. Services required by the Department of Public Instruction for
children with disabilities.
2. Children and family support services, including social worker
and school nurse services.
3. Other health services, including dental screenings, vision
screenings, and similar health services that apply to other
students enrolled in the local school administrative unit.
4. Parent involvement coordinator services.
5. School counselor services.
Page 14 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4c) Costs of services; reimbursement. – The local school administrative unit may
charge the costs of the facilities and services provided pursuant to
sub-subdivisions a. and d. of subdivision (4b) of this subsection to the
laboratory school. These charges shall not exceed the standards for
determination of costs established pursuant to subdivision (4) of this
subsection. If a local school administrative unit fails to provide any of the
services listed in subdivision (4b) of this subsection, the laboratory school
may provide those services without the support of the local school
administrative unit. In the event a laboratory school provides its own services
pursuant to this subdivision, the laboratory school may charge the local school
administrative unit for the actual costs of those services, even if those services
exceed the standards for determination of costs established pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection, and the local school administrative unit
shall reimburse the laboratory school for those services from non-State funds.
…."
SECTION 11.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART XII. RENEWAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MODIFICATIONS AND STUDY OF
RENEWAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
SECTION 12.(a) Section 6(p) of S.L. 2018-32 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 6.(p) State Board of Education Review; Termination of Plan. – The State Board
shall conduct a review of the operation and student performance of the local school administrative
unit operating under an approved renewal school system plan following the end of the 2022-2023
2028-2029 school year and, at least every three five years thereafter, to ensure that the unit is
meeting the expected academic, financial, and governance strategic goals set forth in the local
board of education's plan. The State Board may terminate the renewal school system plan after a
review upon any of the following grounds:
(1) Failure to meet the requirements for student performance contained in the
plan.
(2) The majority of schools in the local school administrative unit have been
identified as low-performing schools in the two school years immediately
preceding the review.
If the State Board determines that the local school administrative unit operating under an
approved renewal school system plan has failed to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal
management or violated State or federal law, the State Board may terminate the renewal school
system plan prior to the end of 2022-2023 the 2028-2029 school year. In addition, if the State
Superintendent finds that satisfactory progress is not being made after reviewing the reports
required to be submitted under subsection (q) of this section, the State Superintendent shall
recommend to the State Board that the renewal school system plan be terminated immediately.
The State Board shall terminate the renewal school system plan if such a recommendation is
made by the State Superintendent.
Upon termination of the renewal school system plan by the State Board, the State Board shall
develop a transition plan for the local board of education to revert to operating the local school
administrative unit in accordance with applicable State laws and regulations for other local school
administrative units."
SECTION 12.(b) Section 6(q) of S.L. 2018-32 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 6.(q) Reporting to State Superintendent. – The local school administrative unit
operating under an approved renewal school system plan shall report to the State Superintendent
of Public Instruction as follows:
(1) An annual report on the assessment instruments used pursuant to
G.S. 115C-174.11(a) and the student outcomes based on those assessments.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An annual report on the number of classroom teacher and school administrator
vacancies, turnover, and use of long-term substitutes in filling vacancies for
both classroom teachers and school administrators. This report shall also
provide comparisons with the statewide data on these items. In addition, the
report shall also provide comparisons with the previous year's data on these
items both at the local school administrative unit level and statewide.
(3) An annual report on student absences. This data shall provide comparisons
with the previous year's data on these items.
(4) Any other reporting requirements deemed necessary by the State
Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(5) Proficiency data on each end-of-grade or end-of-course exam.
(6) EVAAS growth data for the local school administrative unit.
(7) The number of former students employed, enlisted in the Armed Forces of the
United States, or enrolled in a postsecondary educational program.
(8) The high school graduation rate for the local school administrative unit.
(9) The rate of chronic absenteeism in the local school administrative unit, with
chronic absenteeism being more than 10 absences within 90 instructional
days."
SECTION 12.(c) S.L. 2018-32 is amended by adding a new section to read:
"SECTION 6.(k1) Teacher Evaluations. – Local school administrative units operating under
a renewal school system plan may use an alternative evaluation model to the North Carolina
Educator Evaluation System (NCEES) when evaluating teacher effectiveness."
SECTION 12.(d) The North Carolina Collaboratory shall conduct a study on the
following topics:
(1) The effect of the Renewal School System on student outcomes.
(2) An analysis of how financial and personnel flexibilities permitted under a
renewal school system plan have been utilized.
SECTION 12.(e) The North Carolina Collaboratory shall report on the results of the
study conducted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee by January 15, 2026.
SECTION 12.(f) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART XIII. SCHOOL SAFETY GRANTS
SECTION 13.(a) Section 7.36(f) of S.L. 2023-134, as amended by Section 3J.17 of
S.L. 2024-57, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.36.(f) Grants for Training to Increase School Safety. – Of the funds
appropriated by this act for the grants provided in this section, the Executive Director of the
Center for Safer Schools, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services,
shall award grants to public school units to contract with community partners to address school
safety by providing training to help students develop healthy responses to trauma and stress. The
training shall be targeted and evidence-based and shall include any of the following services:
(1) Counseling on Access to Lethal Means (CALM) training for school health
support personnel, local first responders, and teachers on the topics of suicide
prevention and reducing access by students to lethal means.
(2) Training for school health support personnel on comprehensive and
evidence-based clinical treatments for students and their parents or guardians,
including any of the following:
a. Parent-child interaction therapy.
b. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy.
c. Behavioral therapy.
d. Dialectical behavior therapy.
Page 16 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. Child-parent psychotherapy.
(3) Training for students and school employees on community resilience models
to models, violence prevention, and developing personal and interpersonal
skills to (i) enhance individual level protective factors, (ii) mitigate or reduce
risk taking or harmful behavior, and (iii) improve understanding and responses
to trauma and significant stress.
(4) Training for school health support personnel on Modular Approach to
Therapy for Children with Anxiety, Depression, Trauma, or Conduct
problems (MATCH-ADTC), including any of the following components:
a. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy.
b. Parent and student coping skills.
c. Problem solving.
d. Safety planning.
(5) Any other training, including the training on the facilitation of peer-to-peer
mentoring, training or education programming that is likely to increase school
safety. The training or education programming authorized in this subdivision
includes training on the facilitation of peer-to-peer mentoring, education on
personal and interpersonal skills or character education, and education or
training addressing violence prevention and suicide prevention. Of the funds
appropriated by this act for the grants provided in this section, the Executive
Director shall use no more than three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) in the 2024-2025 fiscal year for the services identified in this
subdivision."
SECTION 13.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART XIV. EXTEND REVERSION DATE FOR SCHOOL SAFETY GRANT FUNDS
SECTION 14.(a) Section 7.36(l) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.36.(l) Nonrevert. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction in the 2022-2023 fiscal
year for the 2021-2023 School Safety Grants Program under Section 7.19 of S.L. 2021-180 and
the nonrecurring funds appropriated by this act to the Department of Public Instruction for the
2023-2025 School Safety Grants Program shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain
available for the purposes for which they were appropriated until June 30, 2025.June 30, 2027."
SECTION 14.(b) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. If Senate Bill 125,
2025 Regular Session, becomes law, this section is repealed.

PART XV. SPARKNC EXTENSION
SECTION 15.(a) Section 7.62 of S.L. 2023-134, as amended by Section 3J.14 of
S.L. 2024-57, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.62.(a) There is established the SparkNC Pilot Program (Program) for
beginning with the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. biennium continuing through the 2031-2033
fiscal biennium. The pilot program Program authorizes SparkNC, a North Carolina nonprofit
corporation, in partnership with selected public school units, to develop a nontraditional,
student-driven pathway through which students may select and complete modular learning
experiences that, when aggregated, will provide a competency-based equivalency to a traditional
elective course credit. SparkNC shall provide a menu of modular learning experiences that
include opportunities for work-based learning. For purposes of this section, "Learning
Accelerator" is either a High-Tech or Health Science Learning Accelerator. The
competency-based elective credit shall be denoted on student transcripts as a Learning
Accelerator credit and be focused on science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(STEM). A student may earn up to four credits in Learning Accelerators but may not complete
the same learning experience more than once for credit.
"SECTION 7.62.(b) Each public school unit partnering with SparkNC in accordance with
this section (partnering public school units) shall enter a memorandum of understanding with
SparkNC to meet certain requirements for the Program. These requirements shall include the
provision of a physical learning lab staffed by a learning lab facilitator, operated on a schedule
agreed upon by the public school unit and SparkNC, that will provide a site for collaborative
learning and networking. Learning lab facilitators shall facilitate interdistrict instruction, provide
student advising, design learning experiences, coordinate with industry partners, and validate
student work.
"SECTION 7.62.(c) Notwithstanding any State Board of Education rules, partnering public
school units shall award the elective credit in a Learning Accelerator to any student who
completes a combination of learning experiences determined by SparkNC to provide the
competency-based elective credit in that course upon verification of successful completion of the
learning experiences and integrity of student work products by the learning lab facilitator. The
elective credit shall be denoted as achieved competency on the student's transcript. A student's
participation in learning experiences but failure to earn elective credit shall not be denoted as a
fail on the student's transcript.
"SECTION 7.62.(d) The following provisions shall apply to the Program:
(1) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-295 and any related State Board of Education
rules, learning lab facilitators shall not be required to hold teacher licensure
but shall meet the standards established by the memorandum of
understanding. Learning lab facilitators shall be the teacher of record for
students enrolled in the Program. Additional non-licensed personnel may be
contracted with on a full- or part-time basis for the purpose of providing
timely, real-world content, industry expertise, and student learning
experiences. Learning lab facilitators and contract personnel with the Program
shall be subject to the requirements of Part 6 of Article 22 of Chapter 115C of
the General Statutes (Criminal History Checks).
(2) For the purposes of student participation in the Program, the requirements of
Part 2 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes (Calendar) shall
not apply. Students may continue to participate in the Program and aggregate
learning experiences throughout the time the students are enrolled in the
public school unit and shall not be limited to a semester or school year.
Learning experiences may be provided to students in person, remotely, or
through asynchronous learning experiences.
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-316 or any other law or rule to the contrary,
public school units shall not be required to pay learning lab facilitators in
accordance to the salary schedule used for other teachers employed by the
public school unit.
(4) If a course in computer science is required for high school graduation,
completion of the competency-based elective credit of a High-Tech Learning
Accelerator shall be deemed to satisfy the requirement.
"SECTION 7.62.(e) For the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 school years, all All public school
units are eligible to participate in the Program.
"SECTION 7.62.(f) The nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Department of Public
Instruction in the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 fiscal years for the purposes of this section shall be
allocated as a directed grant to SparkNC to provide students a nontraditional pathway to earn
competency-based Learning Accelerator elective credits. Funds allocated pursuant to this section
shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available until the end of the 2025-2026
Page 18 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2026-2027 fiscal year. SparkNC shall utilize the grant to partner with and provide services in the
maximum number of public school units possible.
"SECTION 7.62.(g) SparkNC, in consultation with the partnering public school units, shall
provide an interim a report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 1,
2025, 1 of each year of the Program on the following information, disaggregated for each public
school unit by grade level and school, when possible:
(1) Number and percentage of student participation in the Program.
(2) Student retention and persistence in the Program.
(3) Student completion of Learning Accelerator elective credits and student
achievement of personalized learning goals within the Program.
(4) Student evaluation of the Program.
(5) Student interest in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
following participation in the Program.
(6) Cost per student for Program participation.
(7) The number and percentage of students who have participated in the Program
who choose to pursue a career pathway or further study in a STEM field.
(8) Public school unit persistence in the Program.
(9) Recommendations for Program changes, including recommended legislative
changes and changes needed to ensure that federal funding for career and
technical education can be used for the Program.
(10) An overview of how all funds appropriated for the Program were spent.
(11) Recommendations on development of a competency transcript.
"SECTION 7.62.(h) SparkNC, in consultation with the partnering public school units, shall
provide a final report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by February 15,
2027, on the following information, disaggregated for each public school unit by grade level and
school, when possible:
(1) Number and percentage of student participation in the Program.
(2) Student retention and persistence in the Program.
(3) Student completion of the High-Tech Learning Accelerator elective.
(4) Student evaluation of the Program.
(5) Student interest in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
following participation in the Program.
(6) Cost per student for Program participation.
(7) The number and percentage of students who have participated in the Program
who choose to pursue a career pathway or further study in a STEM field.
(8) Public school unit persistence in the Program.
(9) Recommendations for Program changes, including recommended legislative
changes and changes needed to ensure that federal funding for career and
technical education can be used for the Program.
(10) Recommendations on development of a competency transcript."
SECTION 15.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART XVI. VARIOUS EDUCATION REPORT CHANGES
SECTION 16.(a) G.S. 115C-12(25) is repealed.
SECTION 16.(b) G.S. 115C-21(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(10) To examine and evaluate issues, programs, policies, and fiscal information
upon the request of the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and
to make reports to that Committee. By March 15 of each year, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit reports to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding schools identified as
low-performing, school improvement plans found to significantly improve
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
student performance, personnel actions taken in low-performing schools, and
recommendations for additional legislation to improve student performance
and increase local flexibility."
SECTION 16.(c) Subdivision (4) of subsection (d) of G.S. 115C-81.45 is repealed.
SECTION 16.(d) Subsection (b) of Section 7.17 of S.L. 2018-5 is repealed.
SECTION 16.(e) Subsection (d) of Section 7.32 of S.L. 2017-57 is repealed.
SECTION 16.(f) G.S. 115C-12(48) reads as rewritten:
"(48) Computer Science Reporting. – The State Board of Education shall report
annually by November 15 March 15 to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Education/Higher Education, and the House Appropriations Committee on
Education on the following data related to computer science participation. For
each item, the report shall include (i) statewide data for the current school
year, and the four years prior when data is available, to establish trends in
computer science instruction and (ii) data for the current school year for each
public school unit, disaggregated by school within that unit:
…."
SECTION 16.(g) G.S. 115C-316.2 is repealed.
SECTION 16.(h) G.S. 115C-316.5(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "school health personnel" refers to the same
positions listed in G.S. 115C-316.2(a).school psychologists, school counselors, school nurses,
and school social workers."
SECTION 16.(i) G.S. 115C-299.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-299.5. Duty to monitor the state of the teaching profession.teacher attrition and
mobility.
…
(b) State of the Teaching Profession Teacher Attrition and Mobility Report. – The State
Board of Education shall monitor and compile an annual report to be submitted by the
Department of Public Instruction by December 15 February 15 annually on the state of the
attrition and mobility of teachers in the teaching profession in North Carolina that includes data
on the decisions of teachers to leave the teaching profession and vacancies in teaching positions
as provided in subsections (c) and (e) of this section. The State Board shall adopt standard
procedures for each local board of education to use in requesting information required by this
report and shall require each local board of education to report the information to the State Board
in a standard format adopted by the State Board.
…."
SECTION 16.(j) G.S. 115C-12(22) reads as rewritten:
"(22) Duty to Monitor the State of the Teaching Attrition and Mobility of Teachers
and the State of the School Administration Professions Profession in North
Carolina. – The State Board of Education shall monitor and compile an annual
report on the state of the teaching attrition and mobility of teachers and the
state of the school administration professions profession in North Carolina, as
provided in G.S. 115C-289.2 and G.S. 115C-299.5."
SECTION 16.(k) G.S. 115C-289.2(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Report Consolidation. – The report required by this section shall be consolidated with
the report on the State of the Teaching Profession Teacher Attrition and Mobility Report required
by G.S. 115C-299.5."
SECTION 16.(l) G.S. 115C-269.50 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-269.50. EPP report cards.
The State Board shall create an annual report card for each EPP that, at a minimum,
summarizes the information collected in the annual performance reports, as set forth in
Page 20 House Bill 832-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 115C-269.35(b). The report cards shall provide user-friendly access to the public, and shall
provide the ability to easily compare annual report card information between EPPs, including
performance and other data reported by each EPP, as provided in G.S. 115C-269.35(b). The State
Board shall make the report cards available to the public through the State Board's Internet Web
site website on an annual basis beginning December 15, 2019, by February 15, and the
Department of Public Instruction shall submit the report to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee annually by that date."
SECTION 16.(m) Subsection (b) of Section 8.30 of S.L. 2015-241, as amended by
Section 3.1(b) of S.L. 2019-165, is repealed.
SECTION 16.(n) G.S. 115C-450(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) No later than May 15, 2022, and every six months thereafter, February 15 of each
year, the Department of Public Instruction shall report all the following information to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, and the Fiscal
Research Division:
…."
SECTION 16.(o) G.S. 115C-218.42(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Reporting. – No later than March August 15 of each year in which funds are awarded
under the Program, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Senate
Appropriations/Base Budget Committee, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Fiscal
Research Division on the administration of the Program, including at least the following
information:
…."
SECTION 16.(p) G.S. 115C-218.110(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The State Board of Education shall review and evaluate the educational effectiveness
of the charter schools authorized under this Article and the effect of charter schools on the public
schools in the local school administrative unit in which the charter schools are located. The Board
shall report annually no later than June September 15 to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee on the following:
…."
SECTION 16.(q) G.S. 115C-107.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-107.5. Annual reports.
The State Board shall report send a copy of the annual report submitted as part of the State
Performance Plan and Annual Performance Report that is submitted to the United States
Department of Education and United States Office of Special Education Programs no later than
October 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the
implementation of this Article and the educational performance of children with disabilities.
Committee. The report may be filed electronically. Each annual report shall include the following
information:
(1) A copy of the following documents that were submitted, received, or made
public during the year:
a. The most recent State performance plan and any amendments to that
plan submitted to the Secretary of Education.
b. Compliance and monitoring reports submitted to the Secretary of
Education.
c. The annual report submitted to the Secretary of Education on the
performance of the State under its performance plan.
d. Any other information required under IDEA to be made available to
the public.
House Bill 832-Third Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An analysis of the educational performance of children with disabilities in the
State and a summary of disputes under Part 1D of this Chapter.
(3) Development and implementation of any policies related to improving
outcomes for elementary and secondary school students with disabilities,
including any changes related to the directives set forth in Section 8.30 of S.L.
2015-241 as follows:
a. Reforms related to IEP requirements.
b. Transition services for students with disabilities from elementary to
middle school, middle to high school, and high school to
postsecondary education, and for employment opportunities and adult
living options.
c. Increased access to Future Ready Core Course of Study for students
with disabilities.
d. Model programs for use by local school administrative units to
improve graduation rates and school performance of students with
disabilities."
SECTION 16.(r) G.S. 115C-107.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-107.3. Child find.
(a) The Board shall require an annual census of all children with disabilities residing in
the State, subdivided for "identified" and "suspected" children with disabilities, to be taken in
each school year. Suspected children are those in the formal process of being evaluated or
identified as children with disabilities. The census shall be conducted annually and shall be
completed by October 15, submitted to the Governor and General Assembly and made available
to the public by January 15 annually. The census submitted to the General Assembly may be a
copy of any similar information or report submitted to the federal government as part of
compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1418.
(b) In taking the census, the Board requires the cooperation, participation, and assistance
of all local educational agencies. Therefore, each local educational agency shall cooperate and
participate with and assist the Board in conducting the census.
(c) The census shall include the number of children identified and suspected with
disabilities, their age, the nature of their disability, their county or city of residence, their local
school administrative unit residence, whether they are being provided special educational or
related services and if so by what local educational agency, the identity of each local educational
agency having children with disabilities in its care, custody, management, jurisdiction, control,
or programs, the number of children with disabilities being served by each local educational
agency, and any other information or data that the Board requires. The census shall be of children
with disabilities between the ages three through 21 but is not required to include children with
disabilities that have graduated from high school."
SECTION 16.(s) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART XVII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 17. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 22 House Bill 832-Third Edition